apertium-ga-gv.ga.dix
    <pardef n="ol/aigh__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ófar</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>óidh</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>óimid</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>óidh</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>óidh</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>óidh</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>óidh</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ófaí</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>óinn</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>óimis</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ófá</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ódh</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ódh</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>óidís</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aithe</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ú</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aím</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aímis</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aigh</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aígí</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aíodh</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aídís</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aíodh</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aigh</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aíomar</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aigh</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aigh</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aigh</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aíodar</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aítí</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aínn</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aímis</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aíteá</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aíodh</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aíodh</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aídís</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aithe</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aithe</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aithe</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aithe</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aítear</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aím</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aímid</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aíonn</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aíonn</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aíonn</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aíonn</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aí</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aímid</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aí</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aí</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aí</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aí</l>
          <r>aigh<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sleá/n__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ine</l>
          <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nta</l>
          <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nta</l>
          <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="caighdeánaigh"><par n="initial-c"/><i>aighdeán</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tiomsaigh"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ioms</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mionathraigh"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ionathr</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gnáthaigh"><par n="initial-g"/><i>náth</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="geamhaigh"><par n="initial-g"/><i>eamh</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bioraigh"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ior</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ransaigh"><i>rans</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cumraigh"><par n="initial-c"/><i>umr</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="altramaigh"><par n="initial-a"/><i>ltram</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="galaigh"><par n="initial-g"/><i>al</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="comharthaigh"><par n="initial-c"/><i>omharth</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="falsaigh"><par n="initial-f"/><i>als</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="athmhúnlaigh"><par n="initial-a"/><i>thmhúnl</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="faobhraigh"><par n="initial-f"/><i>aobhr</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="scáthaigh"><i>scáth</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mionsaothraigh"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ionsaothr</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="séalaigh"><par n="initial-s"/><i>éal</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cnádaigh"><par n="initial-c"/><i>nád</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fionnuaraigh"><par n="initial-f"/><i>ionnuar</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mionnaigh"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ionn</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="malartaigh"><par n="initial-m"/><i>alart</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="athlonnaigh"><par n="initial-a"/><i>thlonn</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stánaigh"><i>stán</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="olaigh"><par n="initial-o"/><i>l</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="deataigh"><par n="initial-d"/><i>eat</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="achtaigh"><par n="initial-a"/><i>cht</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pionósaigh"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ionós</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="scoránaigh"><i>scorán</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bláthaigh"><par n="initial-b"/><i>láth</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="brionnaigh"><par n="initial-b"/><i>rionn</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="inbhéartaigh"><par n="initial-i"/><i>nbhéart</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="luathaigh"><i>luath</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fostaigh"><par n="initial-f"/><i>ost</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="plandaigh"><par n="initial-p"/><i>land</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bunaigh"><par n="initial-b"/><i>un</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mionchoigeartaigh"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ionchoigeart</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="barrchaolaigh"><par n="initial-b"/><i>arrchaol</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="róshaothraigh"><i>róshaothr</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cumasaigh"><par n="initial-c"/><i>umas</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="uasghrádaigh"><par n="initial-u"/><i>asghrád</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="deasaigh"><par n="initial-d"/><i>eas</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="éigiontaigh"><par n="initial-é"/><i>igiont</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gruthaigh"><par n="initial-g"/><i>ruth</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="beartaigh"><par n="initial-b"/><i>eart</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fuathaigh"><par n="initial-f"/><i>uath</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bolaigh"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ol</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="smachtaigh"><i>smacht</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sleán"><par n="initial-s"/><i>leá</i><par n="sleá/n__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="greamaigh"><par n="initial-g"/><i>ream</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="scrúdaigh"><i>scrúd</i><par n="ol/aigh__vblex"/></e>
